Washington statutes.
RCW 15.09.110

Refund of charges paid.

In regard to any charge made pursuant to RCW 15.09.080, if either the horticultural pest and disease board or the superior court on judicial review disallows such charge, then any amount paid on such charge, together with any interest or penalty, shall be promptly refunded by the county from the county's current expense fund or from any other county funds available. In addition, the county shall pay six percent simple annual interest on such amount refunded.

[ 1969 c 113 s 11.]